Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.090

Investment in warrants on tax refund fund—Breaking of warrants authorized.

Whenever it appears to the county treasurer that the face amount plus accrued interest of the tax refund warrant next eligible for investment exceeds by one hundred dollars the amount of moneys in the county current expense fund available for investment, the county treasurer may notify the warrant holder who shall thereupon apply to the county auditor for the breaking of the warrant and the county auditor upon such application shall take up the original warrant and reissue, as of the date which the original warrant bears, two new refund warrants one of which shall be in an amount approximately equaling, with accrued interest, the amount of moneys in the county current expense fund determined by the county treasurer to be available for investment. The new warrants when issued shall be callable and payable in the same order with respect to other outstanding tax refund warrants as the original warrant in lieu of which the new warrants were issued.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.090. Prior: 1943 c 61 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5545-12.]